Illinois, session 104th, HB667.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Community Energy, Climate, and Jobs 5Planning Act is amended by changing Section 15-1 as follows: 6    (50 ILCS 65/15-1)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on September 15, 2045)8    Sec. 15-1. Short title. This Article may be cited as the 9the Community Energy, Climate, and Jobs Planning Act. 10References in this Article to "this Act" mean this Article.11(Source: P.A. 102-662, eff. 9-15-21.)